Tennessee, session 114, SB0891.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-5-105, is amended by
redesignating the existing language as new subsection (a) and by adding the following as new
subsection (b):
(b) By January 15 of each year, the office of the governor shall submit a report to
legislative committees with subject matter jurisdiction over natural resources detailing all
such lands and waters set apart and dedicated by the governor for wildlife preserves,
including the limits fixed of the lands and waters for such state wildlife preserves.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
SB0891
002779
- 1 -